Arkansas, session 2025, HB1522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-601(c)(6), concerning the Municipal
Aid Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(6) If When a municipality incorporates during a year in which a
federal decennial census is conducted, then for purposes of this section and
until data from a federal decennial or special census is made available to
the municipality, the population of the municipality shall be calculated by
the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office based on the most recent
federal decennial census as calculated by the Arkansas Geographic Information
Systems Office.
*JLL205*
02-25-2025 09:49:13 JLL205

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1522

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-74-313(d)(8)(B), concerning the
disposition of funds generated from a municipal sales tax levied for capital
improvements, is amended to read as follows:
(B) If When a municipality incorporates during a year in
which a federal decennial census is conducted, then for purposes of this
section and until data from a federal decennial or special census is made
available to the municipality, the population of the municipality shall be
calculated by the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office based on the
most recent federal decennial census as calculated by the Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Office.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-70-207(c)(2)(B), concerning the
distribution of highway revenues to county and city funds, is amended to read
as follows:
(B) If When a municipality incorporates during a year in
which a federal decennial census is conducted, then for purposes of this
section and until data from a federal decennial or special census is made
available to the municipality, the population of the municipality shall be
calculated by the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office based on the
most recent federal decennial census as calculated by the Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Office.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that federal population data from
the federal decennial census or a special census is required for the
Treasurer of State to distribute moneys received as municipal turnback funds
or generated from existing county sales and use taxes; that a procedure is
necessary to allow a newly incorporated municipality to use alternative
population data until a special census or the federal decennial census is
conducted for the purpose of distributing municipal turnback funds and county
sales and use tax revenues; that without a proper procedure, a newly
incorporated municipality may not have federal census data for over a year
and will not be able to receive proper disbursement of turnback funds or
county sales and use tax revenues; and that this act is immediately necessary
to enable a newly incorporated municipality to provide the residents of the
02-25-2025 09:49:13 JLL205

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1522
municipality with services that are necessary for the health, safety, and
welfare of the community. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Womack
























02-25-2025 09:49:13 JLL205